Hawaii statutes.
C. Public
Board Members, Reserve Police Officers, Police

Chaplains,
Volunteer Firefighters, Volunteer Boating

Enforcement
Officers, and Volunteer

Conservation
and Resources Enforcement Officers

Note

Subpart heading amended by L 1987, c 121, §1; L 1996, c 260,
§6.

Subpart heading on page 609 of the main volume is reproduced
to correct printing error.

§386-181 Generally. (a) As used in
this section:

"Police chaplain" means a member of
an authorized chaplaincy program of a county police department who performs
services in a voluntary and unpaid capacity under the authorized direction of
an officer of the department.

"Public board" means a governmental
body, regardless of its designation, duly created under authority vested by law
for the purposes of performing quasi-judicial, administrative, or advisory
functions.

"Reserve police officer" means a
member of an authorized reserve force of a county police department who
performs services in a voluntary and unpaid capacity under the authorized
direction of an officer of the department.

"Sheriffs' chaplain" means a member
of an authorized chaplaincy program of the department of public safety who
performs functions similar to a police chaplain in a voluntary and unpaid
capacity for the sheriff division.

"Volunteer boating enforcement
officer" means a member of the authorized volunteer enforcement force of
the harbors division, department of transportation, who performs services in a
voluntary and unpaid capacity under the authorized direction of an officer of
the department.

"Volunteer conservation and resources
enforcement officer" means a member of the authorized volunteer
enforcement force of the division of conservation and resources enforcement,
department of land and natural resources, who performs services in a voluntary
and unpaid capacity under the authorized direction of an officer of the
department.

"Volunteer firefighter" means a
person who performs services for a county fire department in a voluntary and
unpaid capacity under the authorized direction of an officer of the department.

(b) If a member of a public board, a reserve
police officer, a police chaplain, sheriffs' chaplain, a volunteer firefighter,
a volunteer boating enforcement officer, or a volunteer conservation and
resources enforcement officer is injured while performing services for the
board, county police department, county fire department, department of public
safety, harbors division of the department of transportation, or division of
conservation and resources enforcement of the department of land and natural
resources, under the conditions specified in section 386-3, the person or the
person's dependents shall be entitled to all compensation in the manner
provided by this chapter and, for the purposes of this chapter, the person
shall, in every case, be deemed to have earned wages for the services.

(c) In computing the average weekly wages of
an injured public board member, reserve police officer, police chaplain, sheriffs'
chaplain, volunteer firefighter, volunteer boating enforcement officer, or
volunteer conservation and resources enforcement officer:

(1) The person's income from self-employment shall be
considered wages;

(2) The person shall, in no event, be considered to
have earned less than the minimum hourly wage prescribed in chapter 387;

(3) Wages of other employees in comparable employment
shall not be considered; and

(4) All provisions of section 386-51 not inconsistent
with this section shall apply; provided that section 386-51(5) shall not apply.
[L 1968, c 57, §2; am L 1970, c 208, §1; am L 1972, c 54, §1; am L 1977, c 191,
§2; am L 1983, c 124, §15; am L 1987, c 121, §1; am L 1996, c 260, §7; am L
2009, c 138, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next